California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(D) This paragraph shall not become operative for an electrical corporation unless the commission determines that allowing eligible customer-generators to aggregate their load from multiple meters will not result in an increase in the expected revenue obligations of customers who are not eligible customer-generators. The commission shall make this determination by September 30, 2013. In making this determination, the commission shall determine
 if there are any public purpose or other noncommodity charges that the eligible customer-generators would pay pursuant to the net energy metering program as it exists prior to aggregation, that the eligible customer-generator would not pay if permitted to aggregate the electrical load of multiple meters pursuant to this paragraph.

(E) A local publicly owned electric utility or electrical cooperative shall only allow eligible customer-generators to aggregate their load if the utility’s ratemaking authority determines that allowing eligible customer-generators to aggregate their load from multiple meters will not result in an increase in the expected revenue obligations of customers that are not eligible customer-generators. The ratemaking authority of a local publicly owned electric utility or electrical cooperative shall
 make this determination within 180 days of the first request made by an eligible customer-generator to aggregate their load. In making the determination, the ratemaking authority shall determine if there are any public purpose or other noncommodity charges that the eligible customer-generator would pay pursuant to the net energy metering or co-energy metering program of the utility as it exists prior to aggregation, that the eligible customer-generator would not pay if permitted to aggregate the electrical load of multiple meters pursuant to this paragraph. If the ratemaking authority determines that load aggregation will not cause an incremental rate impact on the utility’s customers that are not eligible customer-generators, the local publicly owned electric utility or electrical cooperative shall permit an eligible customer-generator to elect to aggregate the electrical load of multiple meters
 pursuant to this paragraph. The ratemaking authority may reconsider any determination made pursuant to this subparagraph in a subsequent public proceeding.

(F) For purposes of this paragraph, parcels that are divided by a street, highway, or public thoroughfare are considered contiguous, provided they are otherwise contiguous and under the same ownership.

(G) An eligible customer-generator may only elect to aggregate the electrical load of multiple meters if the renewable electrical generation facility, or a combination of those facilities, has a total generating capacity of not more than one megawatt.

(H) Notwithstanding subdivision (g), an eligible customer-generator electing to aggregate the electrical load of multiple
 meters pursuant to this subdivision shall remit service charges for the cost of providing billing services to the electric utility that provides service to the meters.

(5) (A) The ratemaking authority shall establish a net surplus electricity compensation valuation to compensate the net surplus customer-generator for the value of net surplus electricity generated by the net surplus customer-generator. The commission shall establish the valuation in a ratemaking proceeding. The ratemaking authority for a local publicly owned electric utility shall establish the valuation in a public proceeding. The net surplus electricity compensation valuation shall be established so as to provide the net surplus customer-generator just and reasonable compensation for the value of net surplus electricity, while leaving other ratepayers
 unaffected. The ratemaking authority shall determine whether the compensation will include, where appropriate justification exists, either or both of the following components:

(i) The value of the electricity itself.

(ii) The value of the renewable attributes of the electricity.

(B) In establishing the rate pursuant to subparagraph (A), the ratemaking authority shall ensure that the rate does not result in a shifting of costs between eligible customer-generators and other bundled service customers.

(6) (A) Upon adoption of the net surplus electricity compensation rate by the ratemaking authority, any renewable energy credit, as defined in Section
 399.12, for net surplus electricity purchased by the electric utility shall belong to the electric utility. Any renewable energy credit associated with electricity generated by the eligible customer-generator that is utilized by the eligible customer-generator shall remain the property of the eligible customer-generator.

(B) Upon adoption of the net surplus electricity compensation rate by the ratemaking authority, the net surplus electricity purchased by the electric utility shall count toward the electric utility’s renewables portfolio standard annual procurement targets for the purposes of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 399.15, or for a local publicly owned electric utility, the renewables portfolio standard annual procurement targets established pursuant to Section 399.30.

(7) The electric utility shall provide every eligible residential or small commercial customer-generator with net electricity consumption and net surplus electricity generation information with each regular bill. That information shall include the current monetary balance owed the electric utility for net electricity consumed, or the net surplus electricity generated, since the last 12-month period ended. Notwithstanding this subdivision, an electric utility shall permit that customer to pay monthly for net energy consumed.

(8) If an eligible residential or small commercial customer-generator terminates the customer relationship with the electric utility, the electric utility shall reconcile the eligible customer-generator’s consumption and production of electricity during any part of a 12-month period following the last reconciliation,
 according to the requirements set forth in this subdivision, except that those requirements shall apply only to the months since the most recent 12-month bill.

(9) If an electric service provider or electric utility providing net energy metering to a residential or small commercial customer-generator ceases providing that electric service to that customer during any 12-month period, and the customer-generator enters into a new net energy metering contract or tariff with a new electric service provider or electric utility, the 12-month period, with respect to that new electric service provider or electric utility, shall commence on the date on which the new electric service provider or electric utility first supplies electric service to the customer-generator.

(i) Notwithstanding any
 other provisions of this section, paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) shall apply to an eligible customer-generator with a capacity of more than 10 kilowatts, but not exceeding one megawatt, that receives electric service from a local publicly owned electric utility that has elected to utilize a co-energy metering program unless the local publicly owned electric utility chooses to provide service for eligible customer-generators with a capacity of more than 10 kilowatts in accordance with subdivisions (g) and (h):

(1) The eligible customer-generator shall be required to utilize a meter, or multiple meters, capable of separately measuring electricity flow in both directions. All meters shall provide time-of-use measurements of electricity flow, and the customer shall take service on a time-of-use rate schedule. If the existing meter of the
 eligible customer-generator is not a time-of-use meter or is not capable of measuring total flow of electricity in both directions, the eligible customer-generator shall be responsible for all expenses involved in purchasing and installing a meter that is both time-of-use and able to measure total electricity flow in both directions. This subdivision shall not restrict the ability of an eligible customer-generator to utilize any economic incentives provided by a governmental agency or an electric utility to reduce its costs for purchasing and installing a time-of-use meter.

(2) The consumption of electricity from the local publicly owned electric utility shall result in a cost to the eligible customer-generator to be priced in accordance with the standard rate charged to the eligible customer-generator in accordance with the rate structure
 to which the customer would be assigned if the customer did not use a renewable electrical generation facility. The generation of electricity provided to the local publicly owned electric utility shall result in a credit to the eligible customer-generator and shall be priced in accordance with the generation component, established under the applicable structure to which the customer would be assigned if the customer did not use a renewable electrical generation facility.

(3) All costs and credits shall be shown on the eligible customer-generator’s bill for each billing period. In any months in which the eligible customer-generator has been a net consumer of electricity calculated on the basis of value determined pursuant to paragraph (2), the customer-generator shall owe to the local publicly owned electric utility the balance of electricity
 costs and credits during that billing period. In any billing period in which the eligible customer-generator has been a net producer of electricity calculated on the basis of value determined pursuant to paragraph (2), the local publicly owned electric utility shall owe to the eligible customer-generator the balance of electricity costs and credits during that billing period. Any net credit to the eligible customer-generator of electricity costs may be carried forward to subsequent billing periods, provided that a local publicly owned electric utility may choose to carry the credit over as a kilowatthour credit consistent with the provisions of any applicable contract or tariff, including any differences attributable to the time of generation of the electricity. At the end of each 12-month period, the local publicly owned electric utility may reduce any net credit due to the eligible
 customer-generator to zero.

(j) A renewable electrical generation facility used by an eligible customer-generator shall meet all applicable safety and
 performance standards established by the National Electrical Code, the Institute of Electrical and Electronics Engineers, and accredited testing laboratories, including Underwriters Laboratories Incorporated and, where applicable, rules of the commission regarding safety and reliability. A customer-generator whose renewable electrical generation facility meets those standards and rules shall not be required to install additional controls, perform or pay for additional tests, or purchase additional liability insurance.

(k) If the commission determines that there are cost or revenue obligations for an electrical corporation that may not be recovered from customer-generators acting pursuant to this section, those obligations shall remain within the customer class from which any shortfall occurred and shall not be shifted to any
 other customer class. Net energy metering and co-energy metering customers shall not be exempt from the public goods charges imposed pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 381), Article 8 (commencing with Section 385), or Article 15 (commencing with Section 399) of Chapter 2.3 of Part 1.

(l) A net energy metering, co-energy metering, or wind energy co-metering customer shall reimburse the Department of Water Resources for all charges that would otherwise be imposed on the customer by the commission to recover bond-related costs pursuant to an agreement between the commission and the Department of Water Resources pursuant to Section 80110 of the Water Code, as well as the costs of the department equal to the share of the department’s estimated net unavoidable power purchase contract costs attributable to the customer. The
 commission shall incorporate the determination into an existing proceeding before the commission, and shall ensure that the charges are nonbypassable. Until the commission has made a determination regarding the nonbypassable charges, net energy metering, co-energy metering, and wind energy co-metering shall continue under the same rules, procedures, terms, and conditions as were applicable on December 31, 2002.

(m) In implementing the requirements of subdivisions (k) and (l), an eligible customer-generator shall not be required to replace its existing meter except as set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c), nor shall the electric utility require additional measurement of usage beyond that which is necessary for customers in the same rate class as the eligible customer-generator.

(n) It is the intent of the Legislature that the Treasurer incorporate net energy metering, including net surplus electricity compensation, co-energy metering, and wind energy co-metering projects undertaken pursuant to this section as sustainable building methods or distributive energy technologies for purposes of evaluating low-income housing projects.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 379, Sec. 19.   (AB 1715)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2827.1.

(a) For purposes of this section, “eligible customer-generator,” “large electrical corporation,” and “renewable electrical generation facility” have the same meanings as defined in Section 2827.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, the commission shall develop a standard contract or tariff, which may include net energy metering, for eligible customer-generators with a renewable electrical generation facility that is a customer of a large electrical corporation no later than December 31, 2015. The commission may develop the standard contract or tariff prior to December 31, 2015, and may require a large electrical corporation that has reached the net energy metering program limit of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (c) of Section 2827 to offer the
 standard contract or tariff to eligible customer-generators. A large electrical corporation shall offer the standard contract or tariff to an eligible customer-generator beginning July 1, 2017, or prior to that date if ordered to do so by the commission because it has reached the net energy metering program limit of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (c) of Section 2827. The commission may revise the standard contract or tariff as appropriate to achieve the objectives of this section. In developing the standard contract or tariff, the commission shall do all of the following:

(1) Ensure that the standard contract or tariff made available to eligible customer-generators ensures that customer-sited renewable distributed generation continues to grow sustainably and include specific alternatives designed for growth among residential customers in disadvantaged communities.

(2) Establish terms of service and billing rules for eligible customer-generators.

(3) Ensure that the standard contract or tariff made available to eligible customer-generators is based on the costs and benefits of the renewable electrical generation facility.

(4) Ensure that the total benefits of the standard contract or tariff to all customers and the electrical system are approximately equal to the total costs.

(5) Allow projects greater than one megawatt that do not have significant impact on the distribution grid to be built to the size of the onsite load if the projects with a capacity of more than one megawatt are subject to reasonable interconnection charges established pursuant to the commission’s Electric Rule 21 and applicable state and federal requirements.

(6) Establish a transition period during which eligible customer-generators taking service under a net energy metering tariff or contract prior to July 1, 2017, or until the electrical corporation reaches its net energy metering program limit pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (c) of Section 2827, whichever is earlier, shall be eligible to continue service under the previously applicable net energy metering tariff for a length of time to be determined by the commission by March 31, 2014. Any rules adopted by the commission shall consider a reasonable expected payback period based on the year the customer initially took service under the tariff or contract authorized by Section 2827.

(7) The commission shall determine which rates and tariffs are applicable to customer generators only during a rulemaking proceeding. Any fixed charges for residential customer
 generators that differ from the fixed charges allowed pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 739.9 shall be authorized only in a rulemaking proceeding involving every large electrical corporation. The commission shall ensure customer generators are provided electric service at rates that are just and reasonable.

(c) Beginning July 1, 2017, or when ordered to do so by the commission because the large electrical corporation has reached its capacity limitation of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (c) of Section 2827, all new eligible customer-generators shall be subject to the standard contract or tariff developed by the commission and any rules, terms, and rates developed pursuant to subdivision (b). There shall be no limitation on the amount of generating capacity or number of new eligible customer-generators entitled to receive service
 pursuant to the standard contract or tariff after July 1, 2017. An eligible customer-generator that has received service under a net energy metering standard contract or tariff pursuant to Section 2827 that is no longer eligible to receive service shall be eligible to receive service pursuant to the standard contract or tariff developed by the commission pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 61, Sec. 11.   (AB 205)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2827.7.

Generation eligible for net energy metering that has all local and state permits required to commence construction on or before December 31, 2002, and has completed construction on or before September 30, 2003, shall be entitled, regardless of any change in customer or ownership of the energy system, for the life of the installation, to the net energy metering terms in effect on the date the local and state permits were acquired.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 836, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

2827.8.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this article, the following provisions apply to an eligible customer-generator utilizing wind energy co-metering with a capacity of more than 50 kilowatts, but not exceeding one megawatt, unless approved by the electric service provider.

(a) The eligible customer-generator shall be required to utilize a meter, or multiple
 meters, capable of separately measuring electricity flow in both directions. Nothing in this section precludes the use of advanced metering infrastructure devices. All meters shall provide “time-of-use” measurements of electricity flow, and the customer shall take service on a time-of-use rate schedule. If the existing meter of the eligible customer-generator is not a time-of-use meter or is not capable of measuring total flow of energy in both directions, the eligible customer-generator is responsible for all expenses involved in purchasing and installing a meter that is both time-of-use and able to measure total electricity flow in both directions. This subdivision shall not restrict the ability of an eligible customer-generator to utilize any economic incentives provided by a government agency or the electric service provider to reduce its costs for purchasing and installing a time-of-use meter.

(b) The consumption of electricity from the
 electric service provider for wind energy co-metering by an eligible customer-generator shall be priced in accordance with the standard rate charged to the eligible customer-generator in accordance with the rate structure to which the customer would be assigned if the customer did not use an eligible wind electrical generating facility. The generation of electricity provided to the electric service provider shall result in a credit to the eligible customer-generator and shall be priced in accordance with the generation component, excluding surcharges to cover the purchase of power by the Department of Water Resources, established under the applicable structure to which the customer would be assigned if the customer did not use an eligible wind electrical generating facility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 609, Sec. 2.   (AB 2514)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

2827.10.

(a) As used in this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Electrical corporation” means an electrical corporation, as defined in Section 218.

(2) “Eligible fuel cell electrical generating facility” means a facility that includes the following:

(A) Integrated powerplant systems containing a stack, tubular array, or other functionally similar configuration used to electrochemically convert fuel to electricity.

(B) An inverter and fuel processing system where necessary.

(C) Other plant
 equipment, including heat recovery equipment used to support the facility’s operation or its energy conversion.

(3) (A) “Eligible fuel cell customer-generator” means a customer of an electrical corporation that meets all the following criteria:

(i) Uses a fuel cell electrical generating facility with a generating capacity of not more than five megawatts that is located on or adjacent to the customer’s owned, leased, or rented premises, is interconnected and operates in parallel with the electrical grid while the grid is operational or in a grid independent mode when the grid is nonoperational, and is sized to offset part or all of the eligible fuel cell customer-generator’s own electrical requirements.

(ii) Is the recipient of local, state, or federal funds, or who self-finances projects
 designed to encourage the development of eligible fuel cell electrical generating facilities.

(iii) Uses technology the commission has determined will achieve reductions in emissions of greenhouse gases pursuant to subdivision (b).

(iv) Complies with the emissions standards adopted by the State Air Resources Board pursuant to the distributed generation certification program requirements of Section 94203 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations, or any successor regulation.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, a person or entity is a customer of the electrical corporation if the customer is physically located within the service territory of the electrical corporation and receives bundled service, distribution service, or transmission service from the electrical corporation.

(4) “Net energy metering” means measuring the difference between the electricity supplied through the electrical grid and the difference between the electricity generated by an eligible fuel cell electrical generating facility and fed back to the electrical grid over a 12-month period as described in subdivision (f). Net energy metering shall be accomplished using a time-of-use meter capable of registering the flow of electricity in two directions. If the existing electrical meter of an eligible fuel cell customer-generator is not capable of measuring the flow of electricity in two directions, the eligible fuel cell customer-generator shall be responsible for all expenses involved in purchasing and installing a meter that is able to measure electricity flow in two directions. If an additional meter or meters are installed, the net energy metering calculation shall yield a result identical to that of a time-of-use meter.

(b) (1) Not later than March 31, 2017, the State Air Resources Board, in consultation with the Energy Commission, shall establish a schedule of annual greenhouse gas emissions reduction standards for a fuel cell electrical generation resource for purposes of clause (iii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) and shall update the schedule every three years with applicable standards for each intervening year.

(2) The greenhouse gas emissions reduction standards shall ensure that each fuel cell electrical generation resource, for purposes of clause (iii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), reduces greenhouse gas emissions compared to the electrical grid resources, including renewable resources, that the fuel cell electrical generation resource displaces, accounting for both procurement and operation of the electrical grid.

(c) (1) Every electrical corporation, not later than March 1, 2004, shall file with the commission a standard tariff providing for net energy metering for eligible fuel cell customer-generators, consistent with this section. Subject to the limitation in subdivision (g), every electrical corporation shall make this tariff available to eligible fuel cell customer-generators upon request, on a first-come-first-served basis, until the total cumulative rated generating capacity of the eligible fuel cell electrical generating facilities receiving service pursuant to the tariff, in addition to the installed capacity as of January 1, 2017, reaches a level equal to its proportionate share of a statewide limitation of 500 megawatts cumulative rated generation capacity served under this section. The proportionate share shall be calculated based on the ratio of the electrical corporation’s peak demand compared to the total statewide peak
 demand.

(2) To continue the growth of the market for onsite electrical generation using fuel cells, the commission may review and incrementally raise the limitation established in paragraph (1) on the total cumulative rated generating capacity of the eligible fuel cell electrical generating facilities receiving service pursuant to the tariff in paragraph (1).

(d) In determining the eligibility for the cumulative rated generating capacity within an electrical corporation’s service territory, preference shall be given to facilities that, at the time of installation, are located in a community with significant exposure to air contaminants or localized air contaminants, or both, including, but not limited to, communities of minority populations or low-income populations, or both, based on the ambient air quality standards established pursuant to Division 26 (commencing with Section
 39000) of the Health and Safety Code.

(e) (1) Each net energy metering contract or tariff shall be identical, with respect to rate structure, all retail rate components, and any monthly charges, to the contract or tariff to which the customer would be assigned if the customer was not an eligible fuel cell customer-generator. Any new or additional demand charge, standby charge, customer charge, minimum monthly charge, interconnection charge, or other charge that would increase an eligible fuel cell customer-generator’s costs beyond those of other customers in the rate class to which the eligible fuel cell customer-generator would otherwise be assigned are contrary to the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section, and shall not form a part of net energy metering tariffs.

(2) The commission shall authorize an electrical corporation to charge a fuel cell
 customer-generator a fee based on the cost to the utility associated with providing interconnection inspection services for that fuel cell customer-generator.

(f) The net metering calculation shall be made by measuring the difference between the electricity supplied to the eligible fuel cell customer-generator and the electricity generated by the eligible fuel cell customer-generator and fed back to the electrical grid over a 12-month period. The following rules apply to the annualized metering calculation:

(1) The eligible fuel cell customer-generator shall, at the end of each 12-month period following the date of final interconnection of the eligible fuel cell electrical generating facility with an electrical corporation, and at each anniversary date thereafter, be billed for electricity used during that period. The electrical corporation shall determine if the eligible fuel
 cell customer-generator was a net consumer or a net producer of electricity during that period. For purposes of determining if the eligible fuel cell customer-generator was a net consumer or a net producer of electricity during that period, the electrical corporation shall aggregate the electrical load of the meters located on the property where the eligible fuel cell electrical generating facility is located and on all property adjacent or contiguous to the property on which the facility is located, if those properties are solely owned, leased, or rented by the eligible fuel cell customer-generator. Each aggregated account shall be billed and measured according to a time-of-use rate schedule.

(2) At the end of each 12-month period, where the electricity supplied during the period by the electrical corporation exceeds the electricity generated by the eligible fuel cell customer-generator during that same period, the eligible fuel cell
 customer-generator is a net electricity consumer and the electrical corporation shall be owed compensation for the eligible fuel cell customer-generator’s net kilowatthour consumption over that same period. The compensation owed for the eligible fuel cell customer-generator’s consumption shall be calculated as follows:

(A) The generation charges for any net monthly consumption of electricity shall be calculated according to the terms of the tariff to which the same customer would be assigned to or be eligible for if the customer was not an eligible fuel cell customer-generator. When the eligible fuel cell customer-generator is a net generator during any discrete time-of-use period, the net kilowatthours produced shall be valued at the same price per kilowatthour as the electrical corporation would charge for retail kilowatthour sales for generation, exclusive of any surcharges, during that same time-of-use period. If the eligible fuel cell
 customer-generator’s time-of-use electrical meter is unable to measure the flow of electricity in two directions, paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) applies. All other charges, other than generation charges, shall be calculated in accordance with the eligible fuel cell customer-generator’s applicable tariff and based on the total kilowatthours delivered by the electrical corporation to the eligible fuel cell customer-generator. To the extent that charges for transmission and distribution services are recovered through demand charges in any particular month, no standby reservation charges shall apply in that monthly billing cycle.

(B) The net balance of moneys owed shall be paid in accordance with the electrical corporation’s normal billing cycle.

(3) At the end of each 12-month period, where the electricity generated by the eligible fuel cell customer-generator during the 12-month
 period exceeds the electricity supplied by the electrical corporation during that same period, the eligible fuel cell customer-generator is a net electricity producer and the electrical corporation shall retain any excess kilowatthours generated during the prior 12-month period. The eligible fuel cell customer-generator shall not be owed any compensation for those excess kilowatthours.

(4) If an eligible fuel cell customer-generator terminates service with the electrical corporation, the electrical corporation shall reconcile the eligible fuel cell customer-generator’s consumption and production of electricity during any 12-month period.

(g) A fuel cell electrical generating facility shall not be eligible for the tariff unless it commences operation on or before December 31, 2023, unless a later enacted statute, that is chaptered on or before December 31, 2023, extends this
 eligibility commencement date. The tariff shall remain in effect for an eligible fuel cell electrical generating facility that commences operation pursuant to the tariff on or before December 31, 2023. A fuel cell customer-generator is eligible for the tariff established pursuant to this section only for the operating life of the eligible fuel cell electrical generating facility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 258, Sec. 42.   (SB 155)   Effective September 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

2828.

(a) As used in this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Appropriate TOU tariff” means the Time-of-Use tariff that would be applicable to the City and County of San Francisco account at the renewable electricity generation facility site if the facility at the site were a Pacific Gas and Electric Company bundled
 customer, as determined by Pacific Gas and Electric Company.

(2) “Environmental attributes” associated with the Hetch Hetchy Water and Power (HHWP) at-site renewable generation and HHWP remote renewable generation include, but are not limited to, the credits, benefits, emissions reductions, environmental air quality credits, and emissions reduction credits, offsets, and allowances, however entitled, resulting from the avoidance of the emissions of any gas, chemical, or other substance attributable to the Hetch Hetchy Water and Power renewable electricity generation facility owned by the City and County of San Francisco.

(3) “HHWP at-site renewable generation” means the electricity generated by renewable electricity generation facilities designated by the City and County of San Francisco pursuant to subdivision (b).

(4) “HHWP remote renewable generation” means the electricity generated by renewable electricity generation facilities designated by the City and County of San Francisco pursuant to subdivision (h), to provide electricity to qualifying remote load.

(5) “Interconnection Agreement” means the 1987 agreement between Pacific Gas and Electric Company and the City and County of San Francisco, as filed with and accepted by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission (FERC), and as amended from time to time with FERC approval, which provides for rates for transmission, distribution, and sales of supplemental electricity to the City and County of San Francisco. Nothing in this section shall waive or modify the rights of parties under the Interconnection Agreement or the jurisdiction of the FERC over rates set forth in the Interconnection Agreement.

(6) “Qualifying remote load”
 means the electricity demand of the City and County of San Francisco for load served under the Interconnection Agreement, at sites that are separate from, and not adjacent to, the sites where the renewable electricity generation facility is located, and serviced through a meter or multiple meters other than those serving the sites where the renewable electricity generation facility is located. The separate or remote sites may be designated by the City and County of San Francisco, both inside and outside of the City and County of San Francisco. Where the separate or remote sites are outside the City and County of San Francisco, they shall be located within 20 miles of the City and County of San Francisco or within 20 miles of a HHWP remote renewable generation facility. There is no wattage limit on qualifying remote load.

(7) “Renewable electricity generation facility” means a facility for the generation of electricity that satisfies both of the
 following requirements:

(A) The facility uses biomass, solar thermal, photovoltaic, wind, geothermal, fuel cells using renewable fuels, small hydroelectric generation of 30 megawatts or less, digester gas, municipal solid waste conversion, landfill gas, ocean wave, ocean thermal, or tidal current, and any additions or enhancements to the facility using that technology. 

(B) The facility is owned, or under lease or contract to, the City and County of San Francisco for at least a five-year term and for the full output of electricity from the facility.

(b) The City and County of San Francisco may elect to designate specific renewable electricity generation facilities as HHWP at-site renewable generation, if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) Total peak generating capacity does not exceed 15 megawatts.

(2) The renewable electricity generation facility utilizes a meter, or multiple meters, capable of separately measuring electricity flow in both directions. All meters shall provide “time-of-use” measurement information. If the existing meter at the site of the facility is not capable of providing time-of-use information or is not capable of separately measuring total flow of energy in both directions, the City and County of San Francisco is responsible for all expenses involved in purchasing and installing a meter or meters that are both capable of providing time-of-use information and able to separately measure total electricity flow in both directions.

(3) The amount of all electricity delivered to the electric grid by the designated HHWP at-site renewable generation is the property of Pacific Gas and
 Electric Company.

(4) The City and County of San Francisco does not sell electricity delivered to the electric grid from the designated HHWP at-site renewable generation to a third party.

(c) For each site of a renewable electricity generation facility that comprises the HHWP at-site renewable generation, Pacific Gas and Electric Company shall identify the appropriate TOU tariff for that site. Any electricity exported to the Pacific Gas and Electric Company grid at that site that is not generated from HHWP remote renewable generation pursuant to subdivision (h) shall, for each time-of-use period, result in a monetary credit to be applied monthly as a credit or offset against the invoice created pursuant to the Interconnection Agreement and shall be valued at the generation component of the appropriate TOU tariff. The commission shall determine if it is appropriate to increase the
 credit to reflect any additional value derived from the location or the environmental attributes of, the designated HHWP at-site renewable generation.

(d) Monthly charges and credit amounts for HHWP at-site renewable generation are interim and subject to an accounting true-up, consistent with commission policies and practices. The true-up shall be performed annually or upon the termination, for any reason, of the Interconnection Agreement. The true-up shall accomplish the following:

(1) If the total electricity delivered to the site by Pacific Gas and Electric Company since the previous true-up equals or exceeds the total electricity exported to the grid by the HHWP at-site renewable generation facility at the site, the City and County of San Francisco is a net electricity consumer at that site. For any HHWP at-site renewable generation site where the City and County of San
 Francisco is a net electricity consumer, a credit or offset shall be applied to reduce the obligations of the City and County of San Francisco to an invoice prepared pursuant to the Interconnection Agreement. If there is no invoiced obligation to be reduced, there is no applicable credit.
